Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4192.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3122. (1) Until October 1, 2027, the department may levy and collect an annual groundwater discharge permit fee from facilities or municipalities that discharge wastewater to the ground or groundwater of this state under section 3112. The fee is as follows: (a) For a group 1 facility, $7,500.00. (b) For a any of the following, $1,800.00: (i) A group 2 facility. or a (ii) A mobile home park licensed under section 16 of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2316, that has 1,000 or fewer residents and that would otherwise be considered a group 1 facility. As used in this subparagraph, "mobile home park" means that term as defined in section 2 of the mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2302. (iii) A campground licensed under part 125 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.12501 to 333.12546, that has 1,000 or fewer sites and that would otherwise be considered a group 1 facility. As used in this subparagraph, "campground" means that term as defined in section 12501 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.12501. (iv) A municipality of 1,000 or fewer residents. , $1,800.00. (c) For a group 2a facility, $300.00. (d) For a group 3 facility, $240.00. (2) Within Not later than 180 days after receipt of a complete application for a permit to discharge wastewater to the ground or to groundwater, the department shall grant or deny a permit, unless the applicant and the department agree to extend this time period. If the department fails to make a decision on an application within the time period specified or agreed to under this subsection, an applicant subject to an annual groundwater discharge permit fee shall receive a 15% annual discount on the annual groundwater discharge permit fee. (3) If the person required to pay the annual groundwater discharge permit fee under subsection (1) is a municipality, the municipality may pass on the annual groundwater discharge permit fee to each user of the municipal facility. (4) As used in this section, "group 1 facility", "group 2 facility", "group 2a facility", and "group 3 facility" do not include a municipality with a population of 1,000 or fewer residents.